Illinois, session 104th, HB4649.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Adult Protective Services Act is amended by 5changing Sections 13 and 13.5 as follows: 6    (320 ILCS 20/13)7    Sec. 13. Access. 8    (a) In accord with established law and Department 9protocols, procedures, and policies, the designated provider 10agencies shall have access to eligible adults who have been 11reported or found to be victims of abuse, abandonment, 12neglect, financial exploitation, or self-neglect in order to 13assess the validity of the report, assess other needs of the 14eligible adult, and provide services in accordance with this 15Act.16    (a-5) A representative of the Department or a designated 17provider agency that is actively involved in an abuse, 18abandonment, neglect, financial exploitation, or self-neglect 19investigation under this Act shall be allowed access to the 20financial records, mental and physical health records, and 21other relevant evaluative records of the eligible adult which 22are in the possession of any individual, financial 23institution, health care provider, mental health provider,   HB4649 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1educational facility, or other facility if necessary to 2complete the investigation mandated by this Act. The provider 3or facility shall provide such records to the representative 4upon receipt of a written request and certification from the 5Department or designated provider agency that an investigation 6is being conducted under this Act and the records are 7pertinent to the investigation. 8    Any records received by such representative, the 9confidentiality of which is protected by another law or rule, 10shall be maintained as confidential, except for such use as 11may be necessary for any administrative or other legal 12proceeding. 13    (b) Where access to an eligible adult is denied, including 14the refusal to provide requested records, the Office of the 15Attorney General, the Department, or the provider agency may 16petition the court for an order to require appropriate access 17where:18        (1) a caregiver or third party has interfered with the 19    assessment or service plan, or20        (2) the agency has reason to believe that the eligible 21    adult is denying access because of coercion, extortion, or 22    justifiable fear of future abuse, abandonment, neglect, or 23    financial exploitation.24    (c) The petition for an order requiring appropriate access 25shall be afforded an expedited hearing in the circuit court.26    (d) If the provider agency has substantiated financial   HB4649 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1exploitation against an eligible adult, and has documented a 2reasonable belief that the eligible adult will be irreparably 3harmed as a result of the financial exploitation, the Office 4of the Attorney General, the Department, or the provider 5agency may petition for a temporary restraining order or any 6other relief outlined in subsection (e) an order freezing the 7assets of the eligible adult. The petition shall be filed in 8the county or counties in which the assets are located. The 9court's order shall prohibit the sale, gifting, transfer, or 10wasting of the assets of the eligible adult, both real and 11personal, owned by, or vested in, the eligible adult, without 12the express permission of the court. The petition to freeze 13the assets of the eligible adult shall be afforded an 14expedited hearing in the circuit court.15    (e) Temporary restraining order; service; hearing.16        (1)(A) The court may grant a temporary restraining 17    order ex parte, pending a full hearing, and may grant such 18    relief as the court deems proper if the court finds that:19            (i) An immediate and present danger of 20        exploitation of the eligible adult exists.21            (ii) There is a likelihood of irreparable harm and 22        nonavailability of an adequate remedy at law.23            (iii) There is a substantial likelihood of success 24        on the merits.25            (iv) The threatened injury to the eligible adult 26        outweighs possible harm to the respondent.  HB4649 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1            (v) Granting a temporary restraining order will 2        not disserve the public interest.3            (vi) The temporary restraining order provides for 4        the eligible adult's physical or financial safety.5        (B) Such relief the court deems proper may include, 6    but is not limited to, any of the following:7            (i) Restraining the respondent from committing any 8        acts of exploitation against the eligible adult.9            (ii) Awarding to the eligible adult the temporary 10        exclusive use and possession of the dwelling that the 11        eligible adult and the respondent share, or barring 12        the respondent from the residence of the eligible 13        adult. The court shall confirm the availability of any 14        required services or alternative caregivers that may 15        be necessary to ensure the eligible adult's safety.16            (iii) Freezing any assets of the eligible adult in 17        any depository or financial institution whether titled 18        solely in the eligible adult's name, solely in the 19        respondent's name, jointly with the respondent, in 20        guardianship, in trust, or in a Totten trust, provided 21        that:22                (I) Assets held by a guardian for the eligible 23            adult may be frozen only by an order entered by the 24            court overseeing the guardianship proceeding.25                (II) Assets held by a trust may be frozen only 26            by an order of the court if all the trustees of the   HB4649 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1            trust are served with process and are given 2            reasonable notice before any hearing on the 3            petition.4                (III) Assets held solely in the name of the 5            respondent may only be frozen on an ex parte basis 6            if the petition and affidavit demonstrate to the 7            court probable cause that such assets are 8            traceable to the unlawful exploitation of the 9            eligible adult, that such assets are likely to be 10            returned to the eligible adult after a final 11            evidentiary hearing, and that no other adequate 12            remedy at law is reasonably available.13            (iv) Freezing any line of credit of the eligible 14        adult at any depository or financial institution 15        whether listed solely in the eligible adult's name or 16        jointly with the eligible adult.17                (I) Lines of credit held by a guardian for the 18            eligible adult may be frozen only by an order 19            entered by the court overseeing the guardianship 20            proceeding.21                (II) Lines of credit held by a trust may be 22            frozen only by an order of the court if all the 23            trustees of the trust are served with process and 24            are given reasonable notice before any hearing on 25            the petition.26            (v) Prohibiting the respondent from having direct   HB4649 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1        or indirect contact with the eligible adult.2            (vi) Providing directives to law enforcement 3        agencies.4            (vii) If the court has ordered an asset and credit 5        freeze, ordering that specified living expenses of the 6        eligible adult continue to be paid.7        (2) In a hearing ex parte for the purpose of obtaining 8    an ex parte temporary restraining order, the petitioner 9    can present any relevant evidence, including, but not 10    limited to, verified pleadings, affidavits, police 11    reports, medical reports, financial records, verbal 12    testimony, still photos, audio recordings, and video 13    recordings.14        (3) A denial of a petition for an ex parte temporary 15    restraining order must be by written order and must note 16    the legal grounds for denial. When the only ground for 17    denial is failure to demonstrate appearance of an 18    immediate and present danger of exploitation of an 19    eligible adult, the court must set a full hearing on the 20    petition for a temporary restraining order at the earliest 21    possible date. Nothing in this paragraph affects a 22    petitioner's right to promptly amend any petition 23    consistent with court rules.24        (4) An ex parte temporary restraining order may be in 25    effect for a fixed period not to exceed 15 days unless good 26    cause is shown to extend the order. The ex parte temporary   HB4649 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1    restraining order may be extended one time for up to an 2    additional 30 days. A full hearing, as provided by this 3    Section, must be set for a date no later than the date when 4    the ex parte temporary restraining order ceases to be in 5    effect.6    (f) Reasonable cause. In determining whether a petitioner 7has reasonable cause to believe that the eligible adult is, or 8is in imminent danger of becoming, a victim of exploitation, 9the court shall consider and evaluate all relevant factors, 10including, but not limited to, any of the following:11        (1) The existence of a verifiable order of protection 12    issued previously or from another jurisdiction.13        (2) Any history of exploitation by the respondent upon 14    the eligible adult in the petition or any other eligible 15    adult.16        (3) Any history of the eligible adult being previously 17    exploited or unduly influenced.18        (4) The capacity of the eligible adult to make 19    decisions related to his or her finances and property.20        (5) Susceptibility of the eligible adult to undue 21    influence.22        (6) Any criminal history of the respondent or previous 23    probable cause findings by the adult protective services 24    program, if known.25    (g) Notice of petition and restraining order.26        (1) The respondent shall be personally served, in   HB4649 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1    accordance with Section 2-203 of the Code of Civil 2    Procedure, with a copy of the petition, notice of hearing, 3    and temporary restraining order, if any, before the final 4    hearing.5        (2) If the petitioner is acting in a representative 6    capacity, the eligible adult shall also be served with a 7    copy of the petition, notice of hearing, and temporary 8    restraining order, if any, before the final hearing.9        (3) If any assets or lines of credit are ordered to be 10    frozen, the depository or financial institution must be 11    served as provided in Section 2-204 of the Code of Civil 12    Procedure.13    (h) Final hearing on petition.14        (1)(A) The court may grant such relief as the court 15    deems proper when, upon notice and hearing, it appears to 16    the court that:17            (i) The eligible adult is the victim of 18        exploitation or that the eligible adult is in imminent 19        danger of becoming a victim of exploitation.20            (ii) There is a likelihood of irreparable harm and 21        nonavailability of an adequate remedy at law.22            (iii) The threatened injury to the eligible adult 23        outweighs possible harm to the respondent.24            (iv) Where the restraining order freezes assets of 25        the respondent, the court finds probable cause that 26        exploitation has occurred, the freeze only affects the   HB4649 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1        proceeds of such exploitation, and there is a 2        substantial likelihood that such assets will be 3        ordered to be returned to the eligible adult.4            (v) The relief provides for the eligible adult's 5        physical or financial safety.6        (B) Such relief may include, but need not be limited 7    to, any of the following:8            (i) Continuing the temporary restraining order in 9        part or in whole.10            (ii) Restraining the respondent from committing 11        any acts of exploitation.12            (iii) Awarding to the eligible adult the exclusive 13        use and possession of the dwelling that the eligible 14        adult and the respondent share or excluding the 15        respondent from the residence of the eligible adult. 16        The court shall confirm the availability of any 17        required services or alternative caregivers that may 18        be necessary to ensure the eligible adult's safety.19            (iv) Ordering the respondent to participate in 20        treatment, intervention, or counseling services to be 21        paid for by the respondent.22            (v) Directing that assets under temporary freeze 23        by a restraining order be returned to the eligible 24        adult, or directing that those assets remain frozen 25        until ownership can be determined; and directing that 26        the temporary freeze on any line of credit be lifted.  HB4649 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1            (vi) Where the court has found that the respondent 2        has engaged in exploitation of the eligible adult, 3        entering a final cost judgment against the respondent 4        and in favor of the petitioner for all taxable costs 5        and damages.6            (vii) Ordering such other relief as the court 7        deems necessary for the protection of a victim of 8        exploitation, including injunctions or directives to 9        law enforcement agencies, as provided in this Section.10        (2) The court must allow an advocate to accompany and 11    be present with the petitioner or the respondent in order 12    to provide emotional support during any court proceedings 13    or hearings related to the temporary restraining order, if 14    the petitioner or the respondent has made such a request 15    and the advocate is able to be present.16        (3) The terms of a temporary restraining order as 17    provided in paragraph (1) remain in effect until the 18    temporary restraining order is modified or dissolved.19    (i) Provisions required in any temporary restraining 20order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction. If the 21court enters a temporary restraining order, preliminary 22injunction, or permanent injunction, the court is required to 23make specific findings on the record. The temporary 24restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent 25injunction must, on its face, indicate:26        (1) That the temporary restraining order, preliminary   HB4649 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1    injunction, or permanent injunction is valid and 2    enforceable in all counties of this State.3        (2) That the court had jurisdiction over the parties 4    and subject matter under State law and that reasonable 5    notice and opportunity to be heard were given to the 6    person against whom the temporary restraining order, 7    preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction was 8    sought, in a manner that was sufficient to protect that 9    person's right to due process.10        (3) If any assets or lines of credit are ordered to be 11    frozen, the date that the depository or financial 12    institution was served with the temporary restraining 13    order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction as 14    provided in Section 2-204 of the Code of Civil Procedure.15        (4) The date the respondent was served with the 16    petition for a temporary restraining order, preliminary 17    injunction, or permanent injunction.18    (j) Service.19        (1) The petitioner shall furnish a copy of the 20    petition, the financial affidavit, the notice of hearing, 21    and any temporary restraining order to the sheriff or 22    special process server of the county in which the 23    respondent resides or can be found, who shall serve it 24    upon the respondent as soon thereafter as possible on any 25    day of the week and at any time of the day or night. The 26    petitioner may transmit a facsimile copy of a temporary   HB4649 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1    restraining order and this facsimile copy may be served in 2    the same manner as a certified copy.3        (2) If the respondent has been previously served with 4    the temporary restraining order and has failed to appear 5    at the initial hearing on the temporary restraining order, 6    any subsequent petition for a temporary restraining order 7    or preliminary injunction seeking an extension of time may 8    be served on the respondent by the petitioner or the 9    petitioner's attorney via certified mail in lieu of 10    personal service by a law enforcement officer.11        (3)(A) Within 24 hours after the court issues a 12    temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or 13    permanent injunction to protect an eligible adult against 14    exploitation or changes, continues, extends, or vacates 15    such an order or injunction, the petitioner or the 16    petitioner's attorney must forward a certified copy of the 17    temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or 18    permanent injunction to the sheriff with jurisdiction over 19    the residence of the respondent for service in accordance 20    with this subsection.21        (B) Within 24 hours after the sheriff receives a 22    certified copy of the temporary restraining order, 23    preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction to protect 24    an eligible adult against exploitation, the sheriff must 25    make information related to the order or injunction 26    available to this State's law enforcement agencies by   HB4649 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1    electronically transmitting such information to the 2    Illinois State Police.3        (C) Within 24 hours after the sheriff or special 4    process server has made service upon the respondent and 5    the sheriff has been so notified, the sheriff must make 6    information relating to the service available to other law 7    enforcement agencies by electronically transmitting such 8    information to the Illinois State Police.9        (D) Within 24 hours after a temporary restraining 10    order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction is 11    terminated or otherwise rendered no longer effective by 12    ruling of the court, the petitioner or petitioner's 13    attorney must notify the sheriff receiving original 14    notification of the temporary restraining order, 15    preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction as 16    provided in subparagraph (A). The sheriff shall, within 24 17    hours after receiving such notification from the 18    petitioner or the petitioner's attorney, notify the 19    Illinois State Police of such court action.20    (k) Enforcement.21        (1) As to the respondent, the court may enforce a 22    violation of a temporary restraining order, preliminary 23    injunction, or permanent injunction issued to protect an 24    eligible adult against exploitation through a civil or 25    criminal contempt proceeding.26        (2) If the respondent is arrested by a law enforcement   HB4649 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1    officer, the respondent must be held in custody until he 2    or she is brought before the court, which must occur as 3    expeditiously as possible, for the purpose of enforcing 4    the temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, 5    or permanent injunction and for admittance to bail in 6    accordance with the applicable rules of criminal 7    procedure, pending a hearing.8    (l) Judgment for damages. Actual damages may be assessed 9against the petitioner in a proceeding under this Section if 10the court finds that the petition lacks substantial factual or 11legal support.12    (m) Modification or dissolution of a temporary restraining 13order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction. The 14petitioner, respondent, or eligible adult may move at any time 15to modify or dissolve the temporary restraining order, 16preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction in part or in 17whole. No specific allegations are required for modification 18or dissolution of the temporary restraining order, preliminary 19injunction, or permanent injunction, which may be granted in 20addition to other civil or criminal penalties. The court shall 21promptly hear a motion to modify or dissolve a temporary 22restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent 23injunction.24(Source: P.A. 102-244, eff. 1-1-22.) 25    (320 ILCS 20/13.5)  HB4649 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1    Sec. 13.5. Commencement of action for access; filing fees; 2process; notice; duration of orders.3    (a) Actions for orders seeking access to an eligible adult 4or for any other relief outlined in subsection (e) of Section 513 freezing assets of an eligible adult are commenced: 6        (1) independently, by filing a petition for access to 7    an eligible adult or freezing the assets of an eligible 8    adult in the circuit court; 9        (2) in conjunction with other civil proceedings, by 10    filing a petition for access to an eligible adult or 11    freezing the assets of an eligible adult under the same 12    case number as another civil proceeding involving the 13    parties, including, but not limited to: 14            (i) a guardianship proceeding under the Probate 15        Act of 1975; 16            (ii) a proceeding for involuntary commitment under 17        the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code; 18            (iii) any other proceeding, provided that the 19        eligible adult or the respondent is a party to or the 20        subject of that proceeding.21    (b) No fee shall be charged by the clerk for filing 22petitions or certifying orders. No fee shall be charged by a 23sheriff for service by the sheriff of such a petition, rule, 24motion, or order in an action commenced under this Section.25    (c) Any action for an order for access to an eligible adult 26or freezing assets of an eligible adult, whether commenced   HB4649 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1independently or in conjunction with another proceeding, is a 2distinct cause of action and requires that a separate summons 3be issued and served, except that in pending cases the 4following methods may be used: 5        (1) Delivery of the summons to respondent personally 6    in open court in pending civil or criminal cases. 7        (2) Mailing to the respondent defendant, or, if 8    represented, to the respondent's defendant's attorney of 9    record in the civil cases in which the defendant has filed 10    a general appearance. The summons shall be in the form 11    prescribed by subsection (d) of Supreme Court Rule 101, 12    except that it shall require the respondent to answer or 13    appear within 7 days. Attachments to the summons or notice 14    shall include the petition for access to an eligible adult 15    or freezing assets of an eligible adult and supporting 16    affidavits, if any, and any emergency order for access to 17    an eligible adult or freezing assets of an eligible adult 18    that has been issued.19    (d) Summons may be served by a private person over 18 years 20of age and not a party to the action. The return by that 21private person shall be by affidavit. The summons may be 22served by a sheriff or other law enforcement officer, and if 23summons is placed for service by the sheriff, it shall be made 24at the earliest time practicable and shall take precedence 25over other summonses except those of a similar emergency 26nature.  HB4649 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1    (e) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, notice 2of hearings on petitions or motions shall be served in 3accordance with Supreme Court Rules 11 and 12 unless notice is 4excused by the Code of Civil Procedure, Supreme Court Rules, 5or local rules, as now or hereafter amended.6    (f) Original notice of a hearing on a petition for access 7to an eligible adult or freezing assets of an eligible adult 8may be given, and the documents served, in accordance with 9Supreme Court Rules 11 and 12. When, however, an emergency 10order is sought in such a case on an ex parte application, the 11notice rules set forth in Section 11-101 of the Code of Civil 12Procedure shall apply.13    (g) An order entered in accordance with Sections 13 and 1413.5 shall be valid for a fixed period of time, not to exceed 2 15years.16(Source: P.A. 91-731, eff. 6-2-00.) 17    Section 10. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 18adding Section 2-203.3 as follows: 19    (735 ILCS 5/2-203.3 new)20    Sec. 2-203.3. Service on third party platform; financial 21exploitation. In cases of financial exploitation where the 22alleged perpetrator is unknown or unascertainable, such that 23service is impracticable under items (1) and (2) of subsection 24(a) of Section 2-203, service upon the alleged perpetrator may   HB4649 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 17337 KTG 30761 b1be made on the platform or third party through which the 2alleged financial exploitation occurred. Notice shall be 3provided by the same method used by the alleged perpetrator to 4communicate with the protected party, and documentation of 5identifying information and all service attempts shall be 6filed with the court. The court may order any further 7reasonable measures to effectuate notice and provide an 8opportunity to be heard.